New Jersey, session 222, A1757.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1)  For privilege periods beginning on or after January 1 next following the enactment of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax due pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) in an amount equal to the value of 10 percent of qualified wages paid in the privilege period to a formerly incarcerated individual in the course of sustained employment.  For each privilege period, a taxpayers credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed $1,200 for each formerly incarcerated individual. (2)   For a taxpayer to qualify for the credit allowed pursuant to this section for a privilege period, the taxpayer shall comply with the requirements of this paragraph. Twenty-five percent of the taxpayers new employees for the privilege period for which the credit is claimed shall be formerly incarcerated individuals. If the taxpayer received the credit allowed pursuant to this section for the privilege period immediately preceding the privilege period for which the credit is claimed, then 50 percent of the formerly incarcerated individuals hired in the immediately preceding period shall remain employed by the taxpayer for the privilege period for which the credit is claimed. The taxpayer shall regularly conduct specific recruitment efforts to hire formerly incarcerated individuals and members of the immediate families of formerly incarcerated individuals. b.    (1)   The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period shall be as prescribed by the director. The amount of the credit applied pursuant to this section, added together with any other credit allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), shall not exceed 50 percent of the tax liability otherwise due and shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162. Unused credit resulting from the limitations of this paragraph may be carried forward, if necessary, for use in future privilege periods following the privilege period for which the credit is allowed. (2)   A taxpayer shall not be granted a credit pursuant to this section for the qualified wages paid to a formerly incarcerated individual in a privilege period if the qualified wages of the formerly incarcerated individual or the job providing qualified wages to the individual is included in the calculation of another credit against any State tax or a grant pursuant to P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-124 et seq.) for a period of time that coincides with the applicable privilege period. (3)   If the director determines that a taxpayer is displacing employees and replacing the employees with formerly incarcerated individuals for the primary purposes of obtaining the credit allowed pursuant to this section, the director shall deny the credit allowed under this section for the taxpayer and shall issue a tax assessment for the recapture of credit previously allowed to the taxpayer under this section plus an assessment of 50 percent of any credit subject to recapture as penalty. c.     As used in this section: Director means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of Treasury. "Formerly incarcerated individual" means an individual who previously spent time in the custody of law enforcement authorities, including the Department of Corrections, following conviction of a criminal offense or following the entry of a guilty plea to a criminal charge by the person before a court of competent jurisdiction, who is no longer subject to incarceration. Member of the immediate family means a formerly incarcerated individuals spouse, parent, sibling, or child. "Qualified wages" mean any salaries, wages, and remuneration subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., paid to a formerly incarcerated individual on or after January 1 next following the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) for labor rendered in service to an enterprise of the taxpayer. "Sustained employment" means a period of time no less than 185 business days during the privilege period in which a formerly incarcerated individual is earning qualified wages. 2.    a.  (1)  For taxable years commencing on or after January 1 next following the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax due pursuant to "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to the value of 10 percent of qualified wages paid in the taxable year to a formerly incarcerated individual in the course of sustained employment.  For each taxable year, a taxpayers credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed $1,200 for each formerly incarcerated individual. (2)   For a taxpayer to qualify for the credit allowed pursuant to this section for a taxable year, the taxpayer shall comply with the requirements of this paragraph. Twenty-five percent of the taxpayers new employees for the taxable year for which the credit is claimed shall be formerly incarcerated individuals. If the taxpayer received the credit allowed pursuant to this section for the taxable year immediately preceding the taxable year for which the credit is claimed, then 50 percent of the formerly incarcerated individuals hired in the immediately preceding taxable year shall remain employed by the taxpayer for the taxable year for which the credit is claimed. The taxpayer shall regularly conduct specific recruitment efforts to hire formerly incarcerated individuals and members of the immediate families of formerly incarcerated individuals. b.    (1) A credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not reduce the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., for a taxable year to an amount less than zero. Unused credit resulting from limitations of this paragraph may be carried forward if necessary to future taxable years following the taxable year for which the credit was allowed.  The form and method of carry forward shall be as prescribed by the director. (2)   A taxpayer shall not be granted a credit pursuant to this section for the qualified wages paid to a formerly incarcerated individual in a taxable year if the qualified wages of the formerly incarcerated individual is included in the calculation of another credit against any State tax or a grant pursuant to P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-124 et seq.) for a period of time that coincides with the applicable taxable year. (3)   If the director determines that a taxpayer is displacing employees and replacing the employees with formerly incarcerated individuals for the primary purposes of obtaining the credit allowed pursuant to this section, the director shall deny the credit allowed under this section for the taxpayer and shall issue a tax assessment for the recapture of credit previously allowed to the taxpayer under this section plus an assessment of 50 percent of any credit subject to recapture as penalty. c.     As used in this section: Director means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of Treasury. "Formerly incarcerated individual" means an individual who previously spent time in the custody of law enforcement authorities, including the Department of Corrections, following conviction of a criminal offense or following the entry of a guilty plea to a criminal charge by the person before a court of competent jurisdiction, who is no longer subject to incarceration. Member of the immediate family means a formerly incarcerated individuals spouse, parent, sibling, or child. "Qualified wages" mean any salaries, wages, and remuneration subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., paid to a formerly incarcerated individual on or after January 1 next following the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) for labor rendered in service to an enterprise of the taxpayer. "Sustained employment" means a period of time no less than 185 business days during the taxable year in which a formerly incarcerated individual is earning qualified wages. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.